Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0774.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Agency" or "department" means the department of insurance and financial services. (b) "Agent of a payee" means a person appointed by a payee to collect and process payments as the bona fide agent of the payee. (c) "Applicant" means a person that files an application for a license under this act. (d) "Authorized delegate" means a person that a licensee designates to provide money transmission services in this state on behalf of the licensee. (e) "Closed-loop prepaid access" means access to funds or the value of funds that is paid in advance, may be retrieved or transferred at some time in the future through a device or vehicle, and may be used only to acquire goods or services in transactions that involve 1 or more specific merchants or 1 or more specific locations. (f) "Commissioner" or "director" means the director of the department or his or her the director of the department's designee. (g) "Consumer" means a natural person. (h) (g) "Control" means any of the following: (i) Ownership of, or the power to vote, directly or indirectly, at least 25% of a class of voting securities or voting interests of a licensee or person in control of a licensee. (ii) Power to elect a majority of executive officers, managers, directors, trustees, or other persons exercising managerial authority of a licensee or person in control of a licensee. (iii) The power to exercise directly or indirectly a controlling influence over the management or policies of a licensee or person in control of a licensee. (i) (h) "Control person" means a director, manager, or executive officer of a licensee or applicant or an individual who has the authority to participate in the direction, directly or indirectly through 1 or more other individuals, of the management or policies of a licensee or applicant. (j) (i) "Depository financial institution" means a bank, national bank, savings and loan association, savings bank, or credit union organized under the laws of this state, another state, the District of Columbia, the United States, or a territory or protectorate of the United States whose deposits are insured by an agency of the federal government. (k) "Designated recipient" means the person identified by the sender as the authorized recipient of a remittance transfer to be made by a remittance transfer provider. (l) (j) "Device or vehicle" means an object or information used to provide closed-loop prepaid access or prepaid access, such as a card, code, electronic serial number, mobile identification number, or personal identification number. A device or vehicle may be in either tangible or electronic form. (m) (k) "Executive officer" means an officer, member, or partner of a licensee, including, but not limited to, a chief executive officer, president, vice president, chief financial officer, controller, compliance officer, or any other similar position. (n) (l) "Financial licensing act" means any of the financial licensing acts, as that term is defined in section 2 of the consumer financial services act, 1988 PA 161, MCL 487.2052. (o) "Foreign remittance transfer" means a remittance transfer in which the designated recipient is located in any country other than the United States. (p) (m) "Licensee" means a person that is licensed or required to be licensed under this act. (q) (n) "Location" means a place of business at which activities regulated by this act occur. Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Material litigation" means litigation that, according to generally accepted accounting principles, is significant to an applicant's or a licensee's financial health and must be disclosed in the applicant's or licensee's audited financial statements, report to shareholders, or similar records. (b) "Money" means a medium of exchange authorized or adopted by the United States or a foreign government as a part of its currency that is customarily used and accepted as a medium of exchange in the country of issuance. The term includes a monetary unit of account established by an intergovernmental organization or by agreement between 2 or more governments. (c) "Money transmission services" means selling or issuing payment instruments or closed-loop prepaid access or prepaid access devices or vehicles or receiving money or monetary value for transmission. The term does not include the provision solely of delivery, online, or telecommunications services or network access. (d) "Outstanding payment instrument" means any check, draft, money order, travelers check, other written instrument, electronic or wire transfer, closed-loop prepaid access or prepaid access device or vehicle, or facsimile issued by a licensee that has been sold in the United States directly by the licensee or any payment instrument issued by the licensee that has been sold by the licensee or an authorized delegate in the United States, that has been reported to the licensee as having been sold, and that has not yet been paid by or for the licensee. (e) "Payee" means the provider of goods or services, not including money transmission services, that is owed payment of money or other monetary value from the person that is paying for the goods or services. (f) "Payment instrument" means any electronic or written check, draft, money order, travelers check, or other wire, electronic, or written instrument or order for the transmission or payment of money, sold or issued to 1 or more persons, whether or not the instrument is negotiable. The term includes any closed-loop prepaid access or prepaid access device or vehicle. The term does not include any credit card voucher, letter of credit, or tangible object redeemable by the issuer in goods or services. (g) "Person" means an individual, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, trust, estate, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency or instrumentality, public corporation, or any other legal entity. (h) "Prepaid access" means access to funds or the value of funds that have been paid in advance and can be retrieved or transferred at some point in the future through a device or vehicle. The term does not include closed-loop prepaid access. (i) "Record" means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form. (j) "Remittance transfer" means, except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the electronic transfer of funds requested by a sender to a designated recipient that is initiated by a remittance transfer provider, whether or not the sender holds an account with the remittance transfer provider and whether or not the remittance transfer is also an electronic fund transfer as that term is defined in 15 USC 1693a. Remittance transfer does not include a transfer of $15.00 or less. (k) "Remittance transfer provider" means any person that provides remittance transfers for a consumer in the normal course of its business, whether or not the consumer holds an account with the person. (l) "Sender" means a consumer who requests a remittance transfer provider to send a remittance transfer for the consumer to a designated recipient. (m) (j) "State" means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or protectorate of the United States. (n) (k) "Travelers check" means an instrument for the payment of money or a foreign currency instrument in any denomination that provides for both of the following: (i) A specimen signature of the purchaser to be completed at the time of purchase of the instrument. (ii) A countersignature of the purchaser to be completed when the instrument is negotiated. (o) "Unauthorized alien" means an individual who is unlawfully present in the United States according to the federal immigration and nationality act, Public Law 82-414. The term unauthorized alien must be interpreted consistently with any applicable federal statutes, rules, or regulations. (p) "Verification form" means the form prescribed by the commissioner under section 35(3) on which a licensee or authorized delegate must document the verification required under section 35(1). Sec. 21a. (1) To enforce section 35, the department may at any time request, and a licensee or authorized delegate must provide, records of documentation used to verify that the sender of a foreign remittance transfer is not an unauthorized alien. (2) A person that believes in good faith that a licensee or authorized delegate is failing to comply with section 35 may file a complaint with the department. (3) A person that knowingly files a false or frivolous complaint under subsection (2), including any complaint that violates federal law, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 60 days, a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (4) On receipt of a valid complaint substantiated by evidence of a violation of section 35(1), the department shall notify the licensee and, if the complaint relates to the licensee's authorized delegate, the authorized delegate of the complaint. (5) Beginning 1 year after the effective date of the rules promulgated under section 35(2), the department shall conduct random quarterly audits of licensees and authorized delegates to ensure compliance with section 35. During an audit, a licensee or authorized delegate shall produce records of the documentation used to verify that each sender of a foreign remittance transfer is not an unauthorized alien. (6) If the department determines that a licensee or its authorized delegate failed to comply with section 35(1), the department, after notice and an opportunity for a hearing, shall impose the civil fine under section 35(5). (7) The department may not audit a licensee or authorized delegate more than once every 2 years under this section unless an audit within the last 6 months found the licensee or authorized delegate out of compliance with section 35(1). Sec. 25. (1) A licensee or any person subject to this act shall maintain all of the following records for at least 3 years: (a) A record of each payment instrument from the date it was created. (b) A general ledger posted at least monthly containing all asset, liability, capital, income, and expense accounts. (c) Bank statements and bank reconciliation records. (d) Records of outstanding payment instruments. (e) Records of each payment instrument paid within the 3-year period. (f) A list of the last known names and addresses of all of the licensee's authorized delegates. (g) All of the following records related to foreign remittance transfers: (i) A record of all foreign remittance transfers initiated by the licensee or an authorized delegate, including the date and amount of each foreign remittance transfer and the name, date of birth, and address of each sender. (ii) The documentation used to verify that the sender of a foreign remittance transfer is not an unauthorized alien. (iii) All verification forms completed by the licensee or an authorized delegate. (iv) Records relating to civil fines paid or due under section 35. (h) (g) Any other records the commissioner reasonably requires. (2) The records described in subsection (1) may be stored on any tangible medium or in any electronic or other medium that is immediately retrievable in perceivable form. (3) A licensee or other person may maintain the records described in subsection (1) outside of this state if they are made accessible to the commissioner. Sec. 35. (1) Beginning 90 days after the effective date of the rules promulgated under subsection (2), a licensee or authorized delegate shall not initiate a foreign remittance transfer unless the licensee or authorized delegate has verified that the sender is not an unauthorized alien in accordance with this section and rules promulgated by the commissioner under subsection (2). (2) The commissioner shall promulgate rules under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, to prescribe the acceptable forms of documentation that a licensee and authorized delegate must use to verify that the sender of a foreign remittance transfer is not an unauthorized alien. (3) A licensee or authorized delegate shall document the verification required under subsection (1) on a form prescribed by the commissioner for this purpose. An authorized delegate shall provide a copy of each verification form it completes to the licensee on whose behalf the authorized delegate provides money transmission services. (4) Not later than 15 days after the end of each calendar quarter, a licensee shall submit a report to the department, in the form and manner prescribed by the department, that includes all of the following: (a) A list of all foreign remittance transfers initiated by the licensee and its authorized delegates during the calendar quarter. (b) For each foreign remittance transfer listed under subdivision (a), all of the following: (i) The date of the foreign remittance transfer. (ii) The amount transferred in the foreign remittance transfer in United States dollars. (iii) The name, date of birth, and address of each sender. (iv) A copy of the verification form completed for that foreign remittance transfer. (c) Calculation of all civil fines due under subsection (5) for foreign remittance transfers initiated during the calendar quarter. Civil fines for the calendar quarter are due at the same time as the report. The licensee shall remit payment of the civil fines when the licensee submits the report. (d) Any other information required by the department to administer or ensure compliance with this section. (5) A licensee that initiates, or whose authorized delegate initiates, a foreign remittance transfer in violation of subsection (1) is subject to a civil fine equal to 25% of the United States dollar amount transferred in the foreign remittance transfer, excluding any fees or charges imposed by the licensee or authorized delegate. If the fine is not remitted under subsection (4), the attorney general may bring an action to collect the fine. A fine collected must be deposited in the state general fund. (6) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this act, a failure to comply with subsection (1) does not subject the licensee or its authorized delegates to any civil sanctions or penalties under this act other than the civil sanction imposed under subsection (5). This subsection does not prevent the department from taking an action described in section 41.